<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89810-0022 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-10-89.f2.A1021</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 153 / Thursday, August 10, 1989/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Wage and Hour Division, Employment Standards Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">29CFR Parts 524, 525, and 529</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN: 1215-AA34</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Employment of Workers With Disabilities Under Special Certificates</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>agency:</T2> Wage and Hour Division, Employment Standards Administration,Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>action:</T2> Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>summary:</T2> This document provides the final text of the regulationsgoverning the employment of individuals with disabilities at special minimumwages under section 14(c) of the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA). A noticeof proposed rulemaking implementing the 1986 Amendments to section 14(c)of FLSA was published on May 20, 1988 (53 FR 18234) and provided for a60-day public comment period. A notice reopening and extending the publiccomment period for 15 days was published on October 31, 1988 (53 FR 43899).In amending the regulations, the Department also elected to incorporatechanges in policies and procedures adopted since these regulations werelast amended in 1966 and to clarify certain areas, such as the requirementto determine prevailing wages, which have proven difficult to administer.In addition, the Department proposed to consolidate the three separateregulations relating to competitive employment, sheltered workshops, andhospitals and institutions, into a single regulation.Forty comments were received during the initial public comment period.Fourteen additional comments were received as a result of reopening andextending the comment period. These comments, while offering numerous specificrecommendations for improving parts of the proposed regulations, were generallysupport of the overall intent of the proposed regulations and the ideaof consolidating the existing three separate regulations into one. Thespecific recommendations contained in the responses have been reviewedand, where appropriate, have been adopted in this final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>effective date:</T2> September 11, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>for further information contact:</T2> Paula V. Smith, Administrator,Wage and Hour Division, U.S. Department of Labor, Room S-3502, 200 ConstitutionAvenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210 (202) 523-8305. This is not a toll-freenumber.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>supplementary information:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>On October 16, 1986, Pub. L. 99-486 was signed and became effective. Thislaw amended section 14(c) of FLSA which has been a part of the Act since1938 and provides for the employment under certificate of workers withdisabilities at special minimum wage rates. Such wage rates are below theminimum otherwise required by FLSA but commensurate with (i.e., based oncomparative productivity) those paid to experienced nondisabled workersperforming essentially the same type of work in the same vicinity. Specialminimum wage rates are permitted in order to prevent the curtailment ofopportunities for employment.Prior to the 1986 Amendments, section 14(c) provided for three distincttypes of certification with different requirements and guarantees. Theprovisions establishing the distinct types of certification were introducedas a part of the FLSA Amendments of 1966. It was the intent at that timeto establish a minimum guarantee of 50 percent of the statutory minimumfor the majority of workers with disabilities employed under a certificate.Workers not receiving such a guarantee would be those participating inevaluation or training programs, those with multiple disabilities, or thoseemployed in work activities centers ``planned and designed exclusivelyto provide therapeutic activities'' for workers with inconsequential productivecapacity.However, as more individuals with severe disabilities were deinstitutionalizedand placed in rehabilitation facilities offering employment as a part ofthe rehabilitation program, the work activities center became the predominanttype of certified facility. By fiscal year 1986, work activities centerscomprised over 55 percent of the certified programs and employed nearly60 percent of the workers employed under certificates.It became apparent, subsequent to the 1966 Amendments, that having threedistinct types of certification and requiring that work activities centers,as a consequence of being planned and designed exclusively for workerswith inconsequential productive capacity, be physically separate from otherprograms was creating serious administrative problems for both the Departmentand the rehabilitation facilities without providing benefit to the workerswith disabilities themselves. Several unsuccessful efforts were initiatedprior to 1986 to amend and simplify section 14(c). In 1986, these effortswere finally successful.The 1986 Amendments eliminated the various types of certification whileretaining the basic requirement that workers with disabilities employedunder certificates be paid wages commensurate with those paid to nondisabledworkers for essentially the same type, quality, and quantity of work. Thelegislation also included the following new provisons:(1) During a two-year period beginning June 1, 1986, wage rates of certainworkers could not be reduced without prior authorization of the Secretaryof Labor; (2) employers must provide written assurances of semi-annualwage reviews for workers paid an hourly wage rate and annual wage reviewsof prevailing wage rates; and, (3) employees may petition for a reviewby an Administrative Law Judge of the special minimum wage rates paid pursuantto section 14(c).After reviewing the 1986 Amendments, the Department undertook the revisionof the regulations. One of the first questions the Department addressedwas whether it was necessary to continue to have three separate regulationsgoverning the employment of workers with disabilities under section 14(c):(1) Regulations, 29 CFR Part 524 governing competitive employment; (2)Regulations, 29 CFR Part 525 governing employment in sheltered workshops;and, (3) Regulations, 29 CFR Part 529 governing employment in hospitalsand institutions. Because of the similarities between these three regulationsand the fact that section 14(c) does not require separate regulations,the Department prepared a proposal combining the three existing regulations.The Department was encouraged in this approach by its Advisory Committeeon Special Minimum Wages, which provides the Department with advice andrecommendations with respect to the administration of section 14(c), andby the various groups which were instrumental in passing the legislation.In addition to incorporating the 1986 Amendments and consolidating thethree regulations, the proposed rule also included several policies developedby the Department since the 1966 Amendments and guidelines intended toclarify areas such as the determination of prevailing wages which haveproven particularly difficult to administer.<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>The recordkeeping provisions that are included in these rules were previouslydeveloped under OMB 1215-0017 in conjunction with 29 CFR Part 516.<ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Comments</ITAG>A total of 54 comments on the proposed rule were received. Thirty-fivewere from local rehabilitation facilities and nine were from local or nationalorganizations of such facilities or their representatives. Five commentswere received from individuals, three from State or local government officials,and two from advocacy groups representing workers with disabilities. Allbut one of these comments were substantive, many containing numerous statementson the proposed rule. None of the comments indicated that the separateregulations should be maintained. The comments did include many statmentsrelating to improvements or clarifications in specific sections of theproposed regulations.The Department has completed its analysis of all of the comments and hasmade changes as appropriate. A section-by-section analysis of these changesfollows: Section 525.1 Introduction This section sets forth the applicability of the regulations and summarizesthe statutory language contained in FLSA section 14(c). One comment wasreceived, stating objections to several statements or requirements. Sincethe commenter did not demonstrate errors in the regulation's summary ofthe statutory language, no change is made in this section. Section 525.3 Definitions This section contains the definitions of the terms used in this part. Tencomments were received on this section. Two of the comments expressed opposition to the use of the terms ``mentaldeficiency'' or ``mentally defective'' in defining the term ``worker witha disability'' in andSection; 525.3(d). The term mental deficiency is usedin FLSA. However, based on concerns voiced earlier by the Advisory Committeeon Special Minimum Wages, the Department is aware that this term is consideredpejorative and is no longer acceptable in the rehabilitation community.The final rule has been amended to delete this phrase. In order to providegreater clarity, this definition has also been amended to include examplesof those disabilities which meet the statutory requirements. The definition of the term ``employ'' in section 525.3(g) generated fivecomments. One indicated, without elaborating, that this definition is currentwith respect to private employers but conflicts with the 1985 FLSA Amendmentsrelating to public employees who may, under certain provisions, volunteertheir services. This definition is a restatement of the basic definitioncontained in FLSA with special emphasis given to its applicability to workerswith disabilities. The Department has reviewed the 1985 Amendments andSubpart B, relating to volunteers, of the Regulations at 29 CFR Part 553and was unable to discern a conflict. One comment expressed concern thatother agencies used the FLSA definition of ``employ'' to determine whowas an employee for purposes of their laws or regulations and asked thatexplicit language be included to make it clear that the definition in theseregulations applies only for purposes of FLSA. The language of the definitionmakes clear that it is limited to FLSA, and no change is required. Onecomment suggested that the six criteria the Department uses to distinguisha trainee from an employee be included in this section of the regulations.In determining whether persons receiving training are or are not employees,the Department applies six judicially developed criteria. These are setforth at section 10b11(b) of the Wage-Hour Field Operations Handbook. This section provides that if all six of the following criteria apply,the trainees or students will not be considered to be employees withinthe meaning of the FLSA: (1) The training, even though it includes actual operation of the facilitiesof the employer, is similar to that which would be given in a vocationalschool; (2) The training is for the benefit of the trainees or students; (3) The trainees or students do not displace regular employees, but workunder their close observation; (4) The employer that provides the training derives no immediate advantagefrom the activities of the trainees or students, and on occasion his orher operations may actually be impeded; (5) The trainees or students are not necessarily entitled to a job at theconclusion of the training period; and, (6) The employer and the trainees or students understand that the traineesor students are not entitled to wages for the time spent in training.Inasmuch as the Department has not been delegated general regulatory authorityunder the FLSA, and these regulations are authorized to govern certainspecial provisions applicable to workers with disabilities, the Departmenthas concluded that the inclusion of this material in these regulationswould be inappropriate. One comment indicated that work which was incidentalto diagnostic assessment, situational evaluation, or work adjustment, shouldnot render an individual an employee. The Department has always consideredwork performed as a part of an evaluation or training program to be compensable.This is made clear in the definition of ``employ'' which states that anemployment relationship ``does not depend upon the level of performanceor whether the work is of some therapeutic benefit.'' This position conformsto various court decisions regarding the employment relationship underFLSA. (A sentence has been added to this definition from 525.4 regardingworkers engaged in producing craft products. See that section for discussion.)One comment notes that andSection;525.3(h) could be read to mean that a certificateis issued ``to a worker with a disability'' and asks if this is correct.This section has been amended to make clear that certificates are issuedto employers, not workers.One comment suggests eliminating the example given in andSection; 525.3(i)for calculating a commensurate wage since the example implies that theDepartment may require commensurate wages in excess of the statutory minimum.The illustrative language has been retained but a statement has been addedmaking it clear that commensurate wages, for purposes of FLSA, need neverbe higher than the statutory minimum wage.Two comments asked that guidance be included regarding the acceptable mannerof weighing the factors of quantity and quality for purposes of arrivingat a commensurate wage for workers paid at hourly rates, and suggest allowingemployers to use differing ratios of quality to quantity based on localindustry surveys. Historically, there have been difficulties in agreeingupon an objective method of determining the commensurate wage rate of individualspaid on an hourly-rate basis as opposed to a piece-rate basis. Based ona demonstration study conducted several years ago with the help of theAdvisory Committee, the Department adopted a policy of accepting a ratioof 90 percent quantity to 10 percent quality as most nearly resulting inpayment of commensurate wage rates. While the Department recognizes thelimitations of this policy, there is no indication that its applicationhas curtailed employment opportunities or resulted in payment of less thancommensurate wage rates. This policy is a rule-of-thumb and, where it isnot appropriate for the work to be performed, variations are allowed. Sincethis policy is used only as a guideline, it is not considered appropriatefor inclusion in these regulations.Two comments expressed concern over the lack of a definition of the termexperienced worker. A definition has been added.Section 524.4 Patient WorkersThis section contains guidelines that are unique to determining if an employmentrelationship exists for patient workers in hospitals or institutions. Therewere four comments on this section.Two comments asked for more guidance with respect to determining underwhat circumstances a patient worker may volunteer to work in the institutionor the community. In addition, one of these comments asked why certainguidelines contained in the Field Operations Handbook (FOH) regarding theemployment relationship were not included in the regulations and whetherthe position regarding the production of craft items was limited to patientworkers. The Department has determined that the regulations contain sufficientguidelines concerning the employment relationship and that inclusion ofadditional guidelines from the FOH is not appropriate in this instance.Upon review, the Department has also determined that the position withrespect to craft items applies to all workers with disabilities, not justthose who are patient workers. This position has therefore been moved toandSection; 525.3(g).One comment asked for a clarification of the statement in this sectionthat no employment relationship exists where an individual ``performs personalhousekeeping chores.'' The comment pointed out a possible conflict withrecently promulgated 42 CFR Part 483 governing Intermediate Care Facilitiesfor the mentally retarded which states that ``* * * it is acceptable forindividuals to engage in household tasks which are in common with otherindividuals, all sharing the total household tasks commonly shared in nuclearfamily units.'' This part also states that ``[t]he expectation is thattasks are the general responsibility of the individual, and that the dutiesrotate to the maximum extent possible.'' The apparent conflict with andSection;525.4 arises from this section's silence on performing commonly sharedhousehold tasks as opposed to performing only one's own personnal chores.In the past, the Department has reviewed individual situations involvingsmall units operating in a family-like or nuclear family manner and hasfound that individuals may share and rotate duties without creating anemployment relationship. The Department agrees that the regulations needto make some reference to such situations, and language has been addedto indicate that performance of commonly shared household tasks may beacceptable. However, the Department does not intend that any facility mayavoid compensating its patient workers by deeming the situation a ``family-likesetting'' and rotating the tasks.The Department feels it is necessary to closely review such situationsand will provide guidance on a case-by-case basis.A lengthy comment was received from representatives of therapeutic communitiesfor substance abuse. The representatives asked that changes be made inandSection;andSection; 525.3 (e) and (g) and andSection; 525.4 to specificallyexclude from the definition of ``employee'' persons who are residents oftherapeutic communities for substance abuse who voluntarily perform tasksin those communities as a part of structured treatment programs. The commentstated that such residents should be excluded because application of FLSAand these regulations would interfere with the rehabilitation program ofthe residents and substantially increase the cost of these programs, whichwould have to be charged back to the residents. The representatives statedthat this special exception should be made because the programs in thetherapeutic communities are not comparable to long-term programs in mentalinstitutions where protection against exploitation and abuse is necessary.The Department currently has a policy with respect to residential programsfor drug treatment as follows: The Department will not assert the existenceof an employment relationship where, but only where, the activities ofthe residents are those ordinarily carried on on a daily basis in a privatehome and not for the economic benefit of the facility; the activities wouldordinarily not be performed by full-time employees; residence at the facilityis short-term (usually no more than one year) and the facility is relativelysmall with no paid staff other than counselors. The representatives oftherapeutic communities state that this policy should be modified since,due to the scope of the drug problem today, facilities have grown larger(up to 300 beds) and programs have grown longer. The Department is awareof the size and scope of the drug problem and understands that some therapeuticdrug treatment programs may have certain features which make them differentfrom programs for individuals with other disabilities. However, the Departmentdoes not conclude that these differences sufficiently distinguish theseprograms from other programs for individuals with disabilities to justifythe action requested.The Department's position that FLSA must be enforced with respect to patientworkers is mandated by the court's ruling in <T3>Souder </T3>v. <T3>Brennan, </T3>72 CCH Lab. Cas. 32, 980 (D.D.C. 1973), which held thatan employment relationship exists ``[s]o long as the institution derivesany consequential economic benefit'' from the work performed by patients.Section 525.6 Compensable TimeThis section clarifies the issue of compensable time with respect to workerswith disabilities. Twelve comments were received on this section.Eight of the comment indicated that including vocational training as anexample of an alternative program that was not a compensable activity wasconfusing since vocational training could easily be directly related tothe workers' jobs and therefore should be compensable. Upon review, theDepartment agrees that the example, as stated, could lead to confusionas to whether training is compensable and has deleted it. One of the commentssuggested including job seeking skills training, independent living skillstraining, or adult basic eduation as additional examples. The exampleshave been added. One comment favored the vocational training example butobjected to restricting it to work not related to the worker's job. Thecomment stated that ruling out programs directly related to the worker'sjob was not in the best interest of the individual with disabilities andthat some training without compensation is fair to the employee and employer.The Department recognizes that many individuals with disabilities participatein rehabilitation programs that include some form of vocational trainingwhich is closely job-related. It also recognizes that the existence ofan employment relationship must be determined on a case-by-case basis (seediscussion concerning andSection; 525.3, <T3>supra</T3>), that such programs are designed primarily to be of ultimatebenefit to the individual, and that the existence of an employment relationshipand payment of wages may not be of primary importance to the individualor the facility. However, once it has been established that an employmentrelationship exists, the Department has no authority to waive the requirementsof FLSA, even where such a relationship may be an incidental or insignificantpart of an overall program. Two comments ask if the guidelines apply toindividuals employed in the community as opposed to those employed in rehabilitationfacilities. These guidelines would apply in any situation. However, itis generally recognized that individuals with disabilities employed inrehabilitation facilities may not be able to leave the facilities whenwork is not available. In such situations, the facilities may provide alternativenoncompensable activities, so long as a clear distinction is made betweensuch activities and those that are compensable. It is unlikely that individualsemployed in the community would be unable to leave the premises of theemployer when work was unavailable or that the employer would be expectedto provide alternative activities. This section does include a referenceto the general guidelines regarding compensable time contained in Part785.Section 525.7 Application for CertificationThis section contains the procedural requirements for submitting an applicationfor a certificate authorizing special minimum wages. Two comments werereceived regarding this section.Four comments state that this section should be considerably expanded byincluding more guidance on the application process. The comments notedconcern about an alleged variance in the interpretation of applicationrequirements among different regional offices of the Department and a backlogof unprocessed applications in certain regional offices which could resultin possible violations. Specifically, it was suggested that the applicationforms themselves, as well as the type and amount of information requiredon them, be made a part of the regulations and that definitions of theterms ``branch establishment'' and ``enclave'' be included. After carefulconsideration, the Department has decided not to include the applicationforms in these regulations. It does not seem that this approach would addressthe concerns expressed in the comments. The applications are official Departmentof Labor forms which must be approved periodically by the Office of Managementand Budget. Placing the official form in the regulations would not precludemisinterpretations or backlogs of unprocessed applications. In addition,puting the application forms in the regulations would increase the lengthand complexity of the regulations and make it difficult to modify theseforms in the future. The Department views the definitions of ``branch establishment''and ``enclave,'' as policy matters which are best addressed in the FOH.However, the Department recognizes the validity of the concerns expressedand intends to initiate efforts after the adoption of this final rule toinsure that there is consistency from region to region. One comment objectsthat certificates become effective upon application, not Departmental approval.This is not current Departmental policy or procedure. Certificates issuedin response to initial applications are effective only after review bythe Department. Special minimum wages are not permitted prior to such approval.The Department recognizes its responsibility to promptly review initialapplications and gives them priority.Section 525.8 Special Provisions for Temporary AuthorityThis section contains provisions relating to obtaining temporary authorityto employ workers with disabilities pursuant to a vocational program administeredby the Veterans Administration or a State agency. There were two commentson this section.One commenter expresses concern that temporary authority, which may onlybe extended for 90 days, could expire before the Department takes actionon the application, resulting in violations due to the lack of a certificate.This response suggested that the regulations require the Department torespond within 90 days. The Department appreciates the need to review suchapplications in a timely manner and has established standards to that effect.The other comment contended that there is no statutory authority for grantingtemporary authority. Section 14(c) of FLSA authorizes the Secretary ofLabor, by regulation or order, to provide for the employment under specialcertificates of individuals with disabilities at special minimum wages.The Secretary has determined that this authority should be exercised bypermitting limited and very temporary self-certification by certain governmentalentities. The purpose of these procedures, which were a part of the regulationsprior to the 1986 Amendments (29 CFR Part 524.4), is to allow for timelyplacements and avoid undue delay. The Department retains oversight oversuch temporary certificates, which are only good for 90 days and may notbe renewed except by the Department. Since these provisions have been along standing part of the regulations without presenting serious problemsthey have been retained in the final rule.Section 525.9 Criteria for Employment of Workers With Disabilities UnderCertificates at Special Minimum Wage RatesThis section contains the criteria for consideration in deciding whetherto issue a certificate authorizing the employment of workers with disabilitiesat special minimum wages. There were thirteen comments on this section.Two of the comments pointed out that the terms ``handicapped'' and ``disabled''had been used interchangeably in this section as well as elsewhere in theregulations, causing possible confusion. The comments also suggested thata definition of the term ``disabled'' be included. The regulations havebeen revised to consistently use the terms ``disabled'' or ``disabilities''in referring to individuals subject to these regulations. While a definitionhas not been added of the term ``disability'' per se, the definition ofthe term ``worker with a disability'' has been expanded to include examplesof disabilities that do or do not fall within the scope of these regulations(andSection; 525.3(d)).Eight of the comments suggested amendments to sections 525.9(a) (2) and(3). Several of the comments suggested changing subsection (a)(2) to read``The prevailing wages of 100% productive experienced employees * * *''Others suggested changing subsection (a)(3) to read ``The productivityof workers with disabilities * * *'' rather than ``The comparative productivityof workers with disabilities * * *'' It was apparent from these commentsthat this subsection was not clearly worded with respect to the Department'sintent. These comments indicated that, if literally interpreted, the proposedsections would have required potential employers of workers with disabilitiesat special minimum wages to determine the productivity of nondisabled experiencedworkers of other employers in the vicinity by visiting the job sites ofsuch other employers. This section has been revised to make it clear thatthe Department does not expect the potential employer to directly determinethe productivity of individuals employed by other employers in order tomake a showing that special minimum wages are required in order to preventthe curtailment of opportunities for employment. The potential employermust determine the productivity of nondisabled workers but may use themethods outlined elsewhere in these regulations.One comment suggests that employers be required to make written assurancesthat employees receive advance written notices of any wage evaluation andwritten notices explaining in detail the results of any such evaluation.The regulations already require, in andSection; 525.12(g), that the workerswith disabilities be informed orally and in writing of the terms of thecertificate under which they are employed. While the Department would encourageemployers to make such information available, the Department is reluctantto add to an employer's paperwork burdens by making this a formal regulatoryrequirement.One comment indicates that annual reviews for both workers paid at hourlyrates and those paid at piece rates should be adequate and that semi-annualreviews for hourly-rated workers should not be required. A semi-annualreview for an hourly-rated worker is a statutory requirement.Section 525.10 Prevailing Wage RatesThis section, which was not contained in previous regulations, providesbasic guidelines with respect to determining a prevailing wage rate forpurposes of paying commensurate wages to workers with disabilities. Theguidelines contained in this section are based on policies developed andused by the Department in administering this requirement and have beendiscussed with the Advisory Committee on Special Minimum Wages.As expected, this section of the proposed regulations drew the most comments,a total of forty-four. While no comment suggested that prevailing wagesare unnecessary, there is considerable disagreement on how an acceptableprevailing wage rate should be determined. In general, the comments soughtclarification of certain points or asked for more specific guidelines.One of the key elements in arriving at the commensurate wage rate of aworker with disabilities is determining the prevailing wage rate. The prevailingwage rate is simply the wage rate paid to workers not disabled for thework to be performed, employed in the vicinity in which the individualsunder the certificates are employed, for essentially the same type, quality,and quantity of work. However, the Department has found, both in administeringthis program and reviewing the comments to the proposed regulations, thatthis single area generates the most disagreement.In general, the comments pointed out numerous areas that needed additionalclarification. After reviewing all of the comments, this section has beenrevised to clarify what the Department will accept as a prevailing wagefor purposes of determining a commensurate wage. The following points havebeen clarified in the final rule: (1) That, while there may not be a singleprevailing wage rate, the employer has the responsibility to demonstratethat the rate used was objectively determined; (2) when employers may usethe wage rates paid to their employees and when surveys must be conducted;(3) what constitutes a representative sample and a similar employer; and(4) that there is no one prescribed method for calculating the prevailingwage.Section 525.12 Terms and Conditions of Special Minimum Wage CertificatesThis section states the terms and conditions of special certificates. Therewere twenty-seven comments on this section.One of the comments recommended that paragraph (c) should indicate thatcertificates would not be issued for periods to exceed one year to insurean annual review by the Department. The Department appreciates the desirabilityof an annual review and it is current policy to require annual renewalof authority to pay special minimum wages. However, the Department haselected not to include this particular policy in the regulations in orderto preserve flexibility in the administration of certificate requirements.One comment pointed out that the term ``experienced worker,'' as used inparagraphs (d) and (f) should be defined. This has been addressed in andSection;525.3(k).Seven comments were received regarding subsection (g) which requires thata worker with a disability, or the worker's parent or guardian, be informedof the terms of a certificate. One comment suggests this subsection shouldspecifically state what terms must be disclosed, because of the possibilityof an appeal under andSection; 525.22, and another suggests that a copy ofthe certificate be given to the workers. Both recommendations have beenaddressed by adding language to this subsection indicating that the disclosurerequirement may be satisfied by making available copies of the certificate.Information with respect to appeals under andSection; 525.22 is covered bythe poster requirement in andSection; 525.14. Two comments ask for clarificationof what is meant by the phrase ``where appropriate.'' It was not the intentof this subsection to require that parents or guardians be informed ofcertificate terms if the worker has an understanding of these terms andchooses not to have other parties informed. Language has been added toclarify this. Two of the comments expressed specific support for requiringwritten and oral notification.There were eighteen comments on paragraph (h) regarding the establishmentof piece rates. Two of the comments point out the need to have this sectionas clearly written as possible, particularly in light of the possibilityof an appeal before an administrative law judge. The Department recognizesthe need for clarity and that there are a number of methods available forestablishing piece rates that are generally recognized and accepted. Difficultieshave arisen not in choosing among such recognized methods, provided suchmethods are properly applied, but in utilizing a recognized method ratherthan paying an arbitrary wage rate. Where an employer determines that specialminimum wages are necessary in order to prevent the curtailment of opportunitiesfor employment, the employer must take those steps necessary to arriveat a commensurate wage. These regulations attempt to establish minimumacceptable procedures under which commensurate wage rates can be determinedwithout creating unnecessary administrative burdens for employers or limitingthe way in which such wages can be determined.One comment asks what is meant by ``other measurement methods'' and ifthere will be a training prerequisite while three other responses ask ifthe Department will provide training. The term ``other measurement methods''is meant to be inclusive rather than exclusive and covers any generallyrecognized method. It is the responsibility of the employer, in order tojustify the payment of special minimum wages, to be able to demonstratethat the method is one generally recognized and accepted among industrialengineers and has been properly applied. The Department will not establishstandards for training but may make some voluntary training available atvarious conferences and workshops. We have added language to paragraph(h)(1) to make the Department's position clear.One comment suggests that the ``50 minute hour'' be cited as an acceptablework measurement method. The Department has accepted a simplified workmeasurement method, usually referred to as the ``50 minute hour,'' andwill continue to do so. However, it is not deemed appropriate or necessaryto cite this method in the regulations since it might imply that it isthe one preferred by the Department.In paragraph (h)(1), one of the comments suggests that a host company'spiece rates could be used where the employer of workers with disabilitiesis subcontracting work from the host or contracting employer and is usingthe same method of production. Language has been included in paragraph(h)(1) to make clear that an employer may use established piece rates wherethe methods of production are the same.One comment asks for further clarification of work measurement specifics,especially in regard to hourly rated workers. After adoption of these regulations,the Department intends to develop nontechnical publications outlining acceptableprocedures and therefore considers it inappropriate and unnecessary toinclude such procedures in the regulations.Several comments pointed out that andSection; 525.12(h)(2)(i) contained atypographical error: ``competition'' should have been ``completion.'' Thishas been corrected.Several comments asked what was meant by successful completion of trainingin performance rating or leveling, whether the Department would providesuch training, and if Departmental personnel will have completed such training.The Department considers performance rating or leveling to be an acceptedwork measurement technique that is used to adjust the observed time ofan individual worker to reflect that worker's pace as compared to the pacethat an average worker could be expected to maintain for an extended period.Departmental personnel will be sufficiently familiar with this techniqueto make a judgment as to whether it has been used appropriately. Severalother specific questions were raised regarding the definition of ``normalor near normal performance,'' the availability of resources to completework measurements, and the training of individuals in specific work measurementmethods. The Department intends to develop nontechnical pamphlets to addressthese issues.Several comments indicated that paragraph (h)(2)(iii) needed clarificationwith respect to when the Department would expect a second work measurementto be conducted. The Department recognizes that employers may develop jigsor fixtures which enable workers with disabilities to perform the workor to increase productivity. For example, where workers with disabilitieshave difficulty in counting, the employer may develop a counting board.Rather than counting the items, the employee would place them on the countingboard and then drop them into a container. However, in determining thestandard for workers without disabilities, the counting board may not havebeen used since it would not have been required to perform the work. Inthis instance, the employer would not have to perform a second work measurement.On the other hand, where an employer does not have a sufficient numberof machines for all workers and some workers must perform tasks manually,a second work measurement would be required for those individuals who donot have access to the machinery, except that the employer may choose touse the higher piece rate for all employees. Paragraph (h)(2)(iii) hasbeen amended to make these requirements clear.Two comments were received regarding paragraph (i) which allows the poolingof earnings in limited circumstances, one opposed to pooling and one supportingpooling. The Department discourages the pooling of earnings since an employerwho pools earnings may not be fulfilling the commensurate wage responsibilities.However, there may be some limited situations, such as that cited in theregulations, where the pooling of earnings would be acceptable. This provisionwas contained in the previous regulations, and since it is applicable onlyin limited situations will be retained.There were ten comments on paragraph (j). These comments pointed out that,if an initial evaluation was not required until after one month, a workerwith disabilities might not receive a commensurate wage during that period.The comments also pointed out that individual workers could change jobsfrequently during a six month period and therefore should have more frequentevaluations. The language of this subsection has been amended in an effortto address those problems.Section 525.13 Renewal of Special Minimum Wage CertificatesThis section contains procedures for certificate renewal. There was onecomment on this section.The comment expressed opposition to paragraph (b), which extends authorityto pay special minimum wages if renewal applications are properly and timelyfiled, and to paragraph (c), which provides for continued payment of specialminimum wages pending review of a denial action. The commenter opposes(b) because employers should be responsible for anticipating their renewalneeds and the statute requires prior authorization, not after-the-factapproval. The purpose of paragraph (b) is to insure that authority to employworkers with disabilities at special minimum wages does not lapse wherethe employer has submitted a properly completed renewal application andthe employer has no reason to believe that the application will be disapproved,but the Department has not had the opportunity to process that application.However, upon further consideration, the Department agrees that employersshould not be permitted to continue paying special minimum wages wheresufficient grounds for denial of an application exist. Paragraph (c) hasbeen amended accordingly.Section 525.14 Posting of NoticesThis section sets forth the requirement that an employer with a certificatepost a notice alerting workers being paid special minimum wages of theterms and conditions of their employment. There were three comments onthis section. One comment opposes the posting of notices since posting a notice regardingworkers with disabilities could stigmatize those workers or discourageemployers from hiring them. The purpose of posting a notice is to insurethat workers employed at special minimum wages are informed of the termsand conditions of their employment. However, the Department recognizesthat in certain situations, such as where an employer may have only oneor two workers with disabilities, posting of the notice may not be in aworker's best interest. We have modified this section to allow the employerto provide the notice directly to the worker.One comment asks for clarification of what is meant by ``as prescribedby the Administrator.'' This has been clarified by adding that the Administratorwill also supply such posters.One comment indicates that copies should be distributed and made availablein other formats, including Braille and recorded tapes. We have added languageto the effect that posters will be made available in other formats on request.Section 525.16 Records to be Kept by EmployersThis section outlines those recordkeeping requirements unique to the employmentof workers with disabilities at special minimum wages. There were sevencomments on this section.Five comments express concern that these regulations now require everyemployer to maintain records verifying a worker's disability. In combiningregulations which dealt separately with competitive employment, nonprofitrehabilitation facilities, and hospitals and institutions, the Departmentoverlooked the difficulty and burden of requiring every employer to maintainmedical records related to a worker's disability. Language has been changedto allow such information to be maintained by other appropriate referringagencies or facilities.One comment expresses concern that the verification of nonobvious disabilitiesis discriminatory and verification should be required for all workers employedat special minimum wages. This language has been deleted.One comment indicates that employees, parents, guardians, or their authorizedrepresentatives should have access to all records identified in this sectionand that records to be kept by employers should also include the resultsof any Wage and Hour investigations and decisions made under andSection;525.22.There is no statutory authority for requiring employers to disclose allrecords to employees. However, insofar as such records become a part ofclosed Departmental investigation files, they may be disclosable underthe Freedom of Information Act.Section 525.17 Revocation of CertificatesThis section contains procedures for revoking certificates where seriousviolations occur or where the certificate is no longer necessary to preventthe curtailment of opportunities for employment. There was one commenton this section.The comment opposed the provision in paragraph (b) extending a certificatein effect during a request for a review of revocation action. The commenterfelt that the basis for revocation should be sufficient to warrant immediatetermination of authority to pay special minimum wages. Upon consideration,the Department concurs with this comment, and has deleted this paragraph.The commenter also opposes paragraph (c) which affords an employer theopportunity to demonstrate or achieve compliance before a certificate isrevoked. The comment would have this section specify that payment of thefull minimum wage should be required. In the Department's view, fairnessrequires that such an opportunity be provided except in cases of willfulnessor where the public interest requires otherwise.Section 525.19 Investigations and HearingsThis section addresses investigations and hearings initiated by the Administratorto review a certification action. There were two comments on this section.Both comments noted the lack of specific rules or procedures for such investigationsor hearings. One asked about authority for such procedures and the relationshipto the provisions for review by an aministrative law judge under FLSA section14(c)(5). Provisions for investigations and hearings have been a part ofthese regulations since their adoption. There are no formal rules pertainingto such procedures, which are separate and apart from proceedings undersection 14(c)(5), and relate only to the issuance or revocation of certificates.Language has been added to make it clear that these procedures are unrelatedto those taken pursuant to FLSA section 14(c)(5).Section 525.20 Relation to Other LawsThis section points out the relationship of the requirements of these regulationsto other laws which may establish higher standards. There was one commenton this part.The comment asked that the regulations adopted the position that the receiptof a certificate does not carry an implied or explicit determination thatthe employer would be exempt from any applicable provision of the NationalLabor Relations Act. While the Department appreciates the concerns expressedin this comment, especially in light of the Court of Appeals decision in<T3>Arkansas Lighthouse for the Blind </T3>v. <T3>NLRB</T3>, 851 F.<T3>2nd</T3> 180 (8th Cir 1988), such a position relates to an interpretationof the National Labor Relations Act, and is inappropriate in FLSA regulations.Section 525.21 Lowering of Wage RatesThis section interprets the provision in section 14(c)(3) prohibiting thereduction of the wage rates of certain workers with disabilities withoutprior approval from the Secretary of Labor until May 31, 1988. There werefive comments on this section.Three of the comments pointed out that the end of the period had alreadypassed, making this section obsolete, and suggested deletion. However,since the statute of limitations covering FLSA violations is two years(three years in the case of willful violations), this section will havesome relevance for several more years. One response asks for additionalguidelines with respect to the criteria listed in (d). Requests for exceptionsduring the period were handled on a case-by-case basis. Since the periodduring which prior approval was required has passed, additional guidelinesare not needed.Section 525.22 Employee's Right to PetitionThis section discusses the employee's right to petition for a review byan Administrative Law Judge (ALJ) of the employee's special minimum wagerate. There were seven comments on this section.Three of the comments asserted that insufficient guidance was given toemployers with respect to the exact criteria that ALJs would use or whetherthe hearing will be a part of the enforcement program of the Wage and HourDivision. The proposed rule reflects the statutory language which was newwith the 1986 amendments. Additional guidance will be made available asexperience is gained.Two comments indicated that workers with disabilities should have the opportunityto work out disputes through a normal grievance procedure at the locallevel. One comment noted that the proposed rule did not preclude such aprocedure but proposed that the rule encourage such. While the Departmentappreciates the importance of such procedures, it considers it inappropriateto include any provision which would in any way tend to discourage an employee'sexercise of rights conferred by the statute.One comment points out that if the employee has no guardian, the involvementof a parent or guardian need not be required if the employee so decides.This is made sufficiently clear in the language which state that a petitionmay be filed by the employee or a parent or guardian.One comment raises a question about the time requirements in paragraphs525.22(b) and (c). Paragraph (b) indicates that all parties to a hearingshall be given at least eight days notice. Paragraph (c) indicates thatany employer intending to participate shall provide documentary evidenceno later than 15 days prior to the commencement of the hearing. Languagehas been added to (c) to provide the employer with additional time wherenotice of the hearing was not timely received. The same comment also containedconcenrs about the time requirements applicable once the ALJ has rendereda decision. Since the time requirements in the regulations essentiallyreflect the statutory language, the Department lacks authority to providefor longer time frames.One comment proposes several technical changes in this section. In paragraph(a), it is suggested that an employee's right to counsel be made clear.We have added language to do so. The comment objects that paragraph (c)permits the Administrator to participate in the proceedings but not otherparties. This provision has been included because the Administrator hasa special role to play and interest in assuring that the law is correctlyand consistently interpreted and applied. The comment also objects to theprovision in paragraph (e) which gives the ALJ authority to determine awage below the statutory minimum where the wages paid are found not justified.The comment indicates that such authority is not found in the statute andthat, where a specific special minimum wage is found not justified, theemployer should be required to pay the full statutory minimum until a newdetermination can be made. The Department believes that the issue of thecorrect wage should not be left unsettled pending further proceedings,and that in the interest of administrative responsibility, the ALJ shouldhave the authority to decide the correct wage based on the evidence presented.Such authority is appropriate to avoid the necessity for continued proceedings.The comment also asserts that paragraph (f) is too open-ended, allowinganyone to seek a review of the decision of an ALJ. This subsection hasbeen amended to clarify that only those who participated in the initialdecision, including the Administrator, may request a review. The commentasks that paragraph (g) be clarified with respect to the amount of timethe Secretary may take to review a decision of an ALJ. The Department readsthe statute as allowing the Secretary 30 days to review the record afterreceiving a request for a review. This respondent also recommends additionallanguage providing for the award of attorney's fees. The Department findsno statutory authority for such fees.Section 525.23 Work Activities CentersThis section restates the provisions of section 14(c)(4) which allow employersto continue to maintain or establish work activities centers. Two commentswere received regarding this section.One comment expressed the view that the use of the term ``inconsequentialproductive capacity'' used in this section disregarded the experience ofthe last several years in successfully placing workers with severe disabilitiesin the community and was both pejorative and unnecessary and suggestedthat the reference be deleted. This term has been deleted from the finalrule.The other comment opposed the use of the term ``deficiency'' as used todefine a worker with a disability. This term is no longer used.Section 525.24 Advisory Committee on Special Minimum WagesThis section provides a regulatory reference to the Committee. One commentaddressed this section.The comment discussed the implied authority of the Administrator to determinethe agenda for a meeting and the composition of the Committee. These mattersare more properly addressed in the regulations on Federal Advisory CommitteeManagement (41 CFR Part 101-6) and the Charter of the Committee, whichmust be filed with and approved by the General Services Administration.In addition to the comments regarding specific sections, there were fivegeneral comments. One asks how to determine whether an employment relationshipexists for incarcerated youthful offenders, many of whom may have beendiagnosed as having mental or physical disabilities, who have been enrolledin sheltered workshop-type programs. Because circumstances may differ fromprogram to program or situation to situation, these questions must be addressedon a case by case basis. One comment suggested it would be helpful if addressesand telephone numbers of various Departmental offices were more readilyavailable because calls to local offices draw blank responses or incorrectreferrals. Lists of all regional offices are available for distribution.In addition, the addresses of individual offices are included on certificatesand posters. One comment suggested basing vacation, holiday, and sick payon the criteria established in andSection;525.12(j) (2) and (3) to satisfystate law requirements even though such requirements are not a part ofFLSA. Since such requirements are not a part of FLSA, the Department maynot set standards in these regulations. One comment addressed the lackof prohibitions against unfair competition. While such a prohibition wascontained in the previous regulations governing the employment of workerswith disabilities in nonprofit rehabilitation facilities, the Departmentappeared to lack statutory authority to enforce such a provision. Therefore,such a prohibition was not included in these regulations. The same commentopposed the payment of fringe benefits under a contract subject to theService Contract Act since many of the individuals are already receivingother benefits such as Medicare or Medicaid. The commenter proposed providingbenefits only to those not already receiving benefits or at the same proportionaterate as productivity. The requirement for full fringe benefits to workerwith disabilities employed under certificates issued pursuant to this partis contained in Regulations 29 CFR Part 4. One comment complained aboutthe difficulty of completing the I-9 form required under the Immigrationand Reform Control Act. This is outside the scope of these regulations.The final question asked was whether there are provisions for trainingin specific recordkeeping requirements or if there are any written guidelines.As soon as the final rule is adopted, the Department intends to developappropriate nontechnical pamphlets and to conduct public training sessionswith respect to these regulations.<ITAG tagnum="84">Executive Order 12291</ITAG>This rule is not classified as a ``major rule'' under Executive Order 12291on Federal Regulations, because it is not likely to result in: (1) An annualeffect on the economy of $100 million or more; (2) a major increase incosts or prices for consumers, individual industries, Federal, State orlocal government agencies, or geographic regions; or (3) significant adverseeffects on competition, employment, investment, productivity, innovation,or on the ability of United States-based enterprises to compete with foreign-basedenterprises in domestic or export markets. Therefore no regulatory impactanalysis is required.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG>This rule will not have a significant effect on a substantial number ofsmall entities. This conclusion is based on all information presently availableto the Department concerning the employment of workers with disabilities.The Secretary has certified to the Chief Counsel for Advocacy of the SmallBusiness Administration to this effect.This document was prepared under the direction and control of Paula V.Smith, Administrator, Wage and Hour Division, Employment Standards Administration,U.S. Department of Labor.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>29 CFR Part 524Handicapped, Minimum wages, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.29 CFR Part 525Disabled, Handicapped, Hospitals, Minimum wages, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements.29 CFR Part 529Hospitals, Minimum wages, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.For the reasons set forth above, 29 CFR Parts 524 and 529 are removed and29 CFR Part 525 is revised as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC, on the 4th day of August, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Elizabeth Dole,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John Fraser,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Assistant Secretary for Employment Standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Paula V. Smith,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator, Wage and Hour Division.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 524_[REMOVED] </ITAG>1. Part 524, Special Minimum Wages for Handicapped Workers in CompetitiveEmployment, is removed. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 529_[REMOVED] </ITAG>2. Part 529, Employment of Patient Workers in Hospitals and Institutionsat Subminimum Wages, is removed. 3. Part 525 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 525_EMPLOYMENT OF WORKERS WITH DISABILITIES UNDER SPECIAL CERTIFICATES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.1 Introduction. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.2 Purpose and scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.3 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.4 Patient workers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.5 Wage payments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.6 Compensable time. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.7 Application for certificates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.8 Special provisions for temporary authority. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.9 Criteria for employment of workers with disabilities under certificatesat special minimum wage rates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.10 Prevailing wage rates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.11 Issuance of certificates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.12 Terms and conditions of special minimum wage certificates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.13 Renewal of special minimum wage certificates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.14 Posting of notices. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.15 Industrial homework. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.16 Records to be kept by employers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.17 Revocation of certificates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.18 Review. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.19 Investigations and hearings. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.20 Relation to other laws. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.21 Lowering of wage rates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.22 Employee's right to petition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.23 Work activities centers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">525.24 Advisory Committee on Special Minimum Wages.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>52 Stat. 1060, as amended (29 U.S.C. 201-219); Pub.L. 99-486, 100 Stat. 1229 (29 U.S.C. 214).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Introduction.</ITAG>The Fair Labor Standards Amendments of 1986 (Pub. L. 99-486, 100 Stat.1229) substantially revised those provisions of the Fair Labor StandardsAct of 1938 (29 U.S.C. 201) (FLSA) permitting the employment of individualsdisabled for the work to be performed (workers with disabilities) at specialminimum wage rates below the rate that would otherwise be required by statute.These provisions are codified at section 14(c) of the FLSA and:(a) Provide for the employment under certificates of individuals with disabilitiesat special minimum wage rates which are commensurate with those paid toworkers not disabled for the work to be performed employed in the vicinityfor essentially the same type, quality, and quantity of work;(b) Require employers to provide written assurances that wage rates ofindividuals paid on an hourly rate basis be reviewed at least once everysix months and that the wages of all employees be reviewed at least annuallyto reflect changes in the prevailing wages paid to experienced individualsnot disabled for the work to be performed employed in the locality foressentially the same type of work;(c) Prohibit employers from reducing the wage rates prescribed by certificatein effect on June 1, 1986, for two years;(d) Permit the continuance or establishment of work activities centers;and(e) Provide that any employee receiving a special minimum wage rate pursuantto section 14(c), or the parent or guardian of such an employee, may petitionfor a review of that wage rate by an administrative law judge.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and scope.</ITAG>The regulations in this part govern the issuance of all certificates authorizingthe employment of workers with disabilities at special minimum wages pursuantto section 14(c) of FLSA.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>(a) ``FLSA'' means the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended.(b) ``Secretary'' means the Secretary of Labor or the Secretary of Labor'sauthorized representative.(c) ``Administrator'' means the Administrator of the Wage and Hour Division,U.S. Department of Labor, or the Administrator's authorized representative.(d) ``Worker with a disability'' for the purpose of this Part means anindividual whose earning or productive capacity is impaired by a physicalor mental disability, including those relating to age or injury, for thework to be performed. Disabilities which may affect earning or productivecapacity include blindness, mental illness, mental retardation, cerebralpalsy, alcoholism, and drug addiction. The following, taken by themselves,are not considered disabilities for the purposes of this part: Vocational,social, cultural, or educational disabilities; chronic unemployment; receiptof welfare benefits; nonattendance at school; juvenile delinquency; and,correctional parole or probation. Further, a disability which may affectearning or productive capacity for one type of work may not affect suchcapacity for another.(e) ``Patient worker'' means a worker with a disability, as defined above,employed by a hospital or institution providing residential care wheresuch worker receives treatment or care without regard to whether such workeris a resident of the establishment.(f) ``Hospital or institution,'' hereafter referred to as ``institution,''is a public or private, nonprofit or for-profit facility primarily engagedin (i.e., more than 50 percent of the income is attributable to) providingresidential care for the sick, the aged, or the mentally ill or retarded,including but not limited to nursing homes, intermediate care facilities,rest homes, convalescent homes, homes for the elderly and infirm, halfwayhouses, residential centers for drug addicts or alcoholics, and the like,whether licensed or not licensed.(g) ``Employ'' is defined in FLSA as ``to suffer or permit to work.'' Anemployment relationship arises whenever an individual, including an individualwith a disability, is suffered or permitted to work. The determinationof an employment relationship does not depend upon the level of performanceor whether the work is of some therapeutic benefit. However, an individualdoes not become an employee if engaged in such activities as making craftproducts where the individual voluntarily participates in such activitiesand the products become the property of the individual making them, orall of the funds resulting from the sale of the products are divided amongthe participants in the activity or are used in purchasing additional materialsto make craft products.(h) ``Special minimum wage'' is a wage authorized under a certificate issuedto an employer under this part that is less than the statutory minimumwage.(i) ``Commensurate'' wage is a special minimum wage paid to a worker witha disability which is based on the worker's individual productivity inproportion to the wage and productivity of experienced nondisabled workersperforming essentially the same type, quality, and quantity of work inthe vicinity in which the individual under certificate is employed. Forexample, the commensurate wage of a worker with a disability who is 75%as productive as the average experienced nondisabled worker, taking intoconsideration the type, quality, and quantity of work of the disabled worker,would be set at 75% of the wage paid to the nondisabled worker. For purposesof these regulations, a commensurate wage is always a special minimum wage,i.e., a wage below the statutory minimum. (j) ``Vicinity'' or ``locality'' means the geographic area from which thelabor force of the community is drawn. (k) ``Experienced worker'' means a worker who has learned the basic elementsor requirements of the work to be performed, ordinarily by completion ofa probationary or training period. Typically, such a worker will have receivedat least one pay raise after successful completion of the probationaryor training period. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Patient workers. </ITAG>With respect to patient workers, as defined in andSection; 525.3(e), a majorfactor in determining if an employment relationship exists is whether thework performed is of any consequential economic benefit to the institution.Generally, work shall be considered to be of consequential economic benefitif it is of the type that workers without disabilities normally perform,in whole or in part in the institution or elsewhere. However, a patientdoes not become an employee if he or she merely performs personal housekeepingchores, such as maintaining his or her own quarters, or receives a tokenremuneration in connection with such services. It may also be possiblefor patients in family-like settings such as group homes to rotate or sharehousehold tasks or chores without becoming employees. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Wage payments. </ITAG>(a) An individual whose earning or productive capacity is not impairedfor the work being performed cannot be employed under a certificate issuedpursuant to this part and must be paid at least the applicable minimumwage. An individual whose earning or productive capacity is impaired tothe extent that the individual is unable to earn at least the applicableminimum wage may be paid a commensurate wage, but only after the employerhas obtained a certificate authorizing payment of special minimum wagesfrom the appropriate office of the Wage and Hour Division of the Departmentof Labor. (b) With respect to patient workers employed in institutions, no deductionscan be made from such individuals' commensurate wages to cover the costof room, board, or other services provided by the facility. Such an individualmust receive his or her wages free and clear, except for amounts deductedfor taxes assessed against the employee and any voluntary wage assignmentsdirected by the employee. (See Part 531 of this title.) However, it isnot the intention of these regulations to preclude the institution thereafterfrom assessing or collecting charges for room, board, and other servicesactually provided to an individual to the extent permitted by applicableFederal or State law and on the same basis as it assesses and collectsfrom nonworking patients. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Compensable time. </ITAG>Individuals employed subject to this part must be compensated for all hoursworked. Compensable time includes not only those hours during which theindividual is actually performing productive work but also includes thosehours when no work is performed but the individual is required by the employerto remain available for the next assignment. However, where the individualis completely relieved from duty and is not required to remain availablefor the next assignment, such time will not be considered compensable time.For example, an individual employed by a rehabilitation facility wouldnot be engaged in a compensable activity where such individual is completelyrelieved from duty but is provided therapy or the opportunity to participatein an alternative program or activity in the facility not involving workand not directly related to the worker's job (e.g., self-help skills training,recreation, job seeking skills training, independent living skills, oradult basic education). The burden of establishing that such hours arenot compensable rests with the facility and such hours must be clearlydistinguishable from compensable hours. (For further information on compensabletime in general under FLSA, see Part 785 of this title.) <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application for certificates. </ITAG>(a) Application for a certificate may be filed by any employer with theRegional Office of the Wage and Hour Division having administrative jurisdictionover the geographic area in which the employment is to take place. (b) The employer shall provide answers to all of the applicable questionscontained on the application form provided by the Regional Office.(c) The application shall be signed by the employer or the employer's authorizedrepresentative.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special provisions for temporary authority.</ITAG>(a) Temporary authority may be granted to an employer permitting the employmentof workers with disabilities pursuant to a vocational rehabilitation programof the Veterans Administration for veterans with a service-incurred disabilityor a vocational rehabilitation program administered by a State agency.(b) Temporary authority is effective for 90 days from the date the appropriatesection of the application form is signed and completed by the duly designatedrepresentative of the State agency or the Veterans Administration. Suchauthority may not be renewed or extended by the issuing agency.(c) The signed application constitutes the temporary authority to employworkers with disabilities at special minimum wage rates. A copy of theapplication must be forwarded within 10 days to the appropriate RegionalOffice of the Wage and Hour Division. Upon receipt, the application willbe reviewed and, where appropriate, a certificate will be issued by theRegional Office. Where additional information is required or certificationis denied, the applicant will receive notification from the Regional Office.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for employment of workers with disabilities under certificatesat special minimum wage rates.</ITAG>(a) In order to determine that special minimum wage rates are necessaryin order to prevent the curtailment of opportunities for employment, thefollowing criteria will be considered:(1) The nature and extent of the disabilities of the individuals employedas these disabilities relate to the individuals' productivity; (2) The prevailing wages of experienced employees not disabled for thejob who are employed in the vicinity in industry engaged in work comparableto that performed at the special minimum wage rate;(3) The productivity of the workers with disabilities compared to the normestablished for nondisabled workers through the use of a verifiable workmeasurement method (see andSection; 525.12(h)) or the productivity of experiencednondisabled workers employed in the vicinity on comparable work; and,(4) The wage rates to be paid to the workers with disabilities for workcomparable to that performed by experienced nondisabled workers.(b) In order to be granted a certificate authorizing the employment ofworkers with disabilities at special minimum wage rates, the employer mustprovide the following written assurances concerning such employment:(1) In the case of individuals paid hourly rates, the special minimum wagerates will be reviewed by the employer at periodic intervals at a minimumof once every six months; and,(2) Wages for all employees will be adjusted by the employer at periodicintervals at a minimum of once each year to reflect changes in the prevailingwages paid to experienced nondisabled individuals employed in the localityfor essentially the same type of work.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prevailing wage rates.</ITAG>(a) A prevailing wage rate is a wage rate that is paid to an experiencedworker not disabled for the work to be performed. The Department recognizesthat there may be more than one wage rate for a specific type of work ina given area. An employer must be able to demonstrate that the rate beingused as prevailing for determining a commensurate wage was objectivelydetermined according to the guidelines contained in this section.(b) An employer whose work force primarily consists of nondisabled workersor who employs more than a token number of nondisabled workers doing similarwork may use as the prevailing wage the wage rate paid to that employer'sexperienced nondisabled employees performing similar work. Where an agencyplaces a worker or workers with disabilities on the premises of an employerdescribed above, the wage paid to the employer's experienced workers maybe used as prevailing.(c) An employer whose work force primarily consists of workers disabledfor the work to be performed may determine the prevailing wage by ascertainingthe wage rates paid to the experienced nondisabled workers of other employersin the vicinity. Such data may be obtained by surveying comparable firmsin the area that employ primarily nondisabled workers doing similar work.The firms surveyed must be representative of comparable firms in termsof wages paid to experienced workers doing similar work. The appropriatesize of such a sample will depend on the number of firms doing similarwork but should include no less than three firms unless there are fewerfirms doing such work in the area. A comparable firm is one which is ofsimilar size in terms of employees or which competes for or bids on contractsof a similar size or nature. Employers may contact other sources such asthe Bureau of Labor Statistics or private or State employment serviceswhere surveys are not practical. If similar work cannot be found in thearea defined by the geographic labor market, the closest comparable communitymay be used.(d) The prevailing wage rate must be based upon the wage rate paid to experiencednondisabled workers as defined elsewhere in these regulations. Employmentservices which only provide entry level wage data are not acceptable assources for prevailing wage information as required in these regulations.(e) There is no prescribed method for tabulating the results of a prevailingwage survey. For example, either a weighted or unweighted average wouldbe acceptable provided the employer is consistent in the methodology used.(f) The prevailing wage must be based upon work utilizing similar methodsand equipment. Where the employer is unable to obtain the prevailing wagefor a specific job to be performed on the premises, such as collating documents,it would be acceptable to use as the prevailing wage the wage paid to experiencedindividuals employed in similar jobs such as file clerk or general officeclerk, requiring the same general skill levels.(g) The following information should be recorded in documenting the determinationof prevailing wage rates:(1) Date of contact with firm or other source;(2) Name, address, and phone number of firm or other source contacted;(3) Individual contacted within firm or source;(4) Title of individual contacted;(5) Wage rate information provided;(6) Brief description of work for which wage information is provided;(7) Basis for the conclusion that wage rate is not based upon an entrylevel position. (See also andSection;525.10(c).)(h) A prevailing wage may not be less than the minimum wage specified insection 6(a) of FLSA.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;525.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance of certificates.</ITAG>(a) Upon consideration of the criteria cited in these regulations, a specialcertificate may be issued.(b) If a special minimum wage certificate is issued, a copy shall be sentto the employer. If denied, the employer will be notified in writing andtold the reasons for the denial, as well as the right to petition underandSection;525.18.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;525.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Terms and conditions of special minimum wage certificates.</ITAG>(a) A special minimum wage certificate shall specify the terms and conditionsunder which it is granted.(b) A special minimum wage certificate shall apply to all workers employedby the employer to which the special certificate is granted provided suchworkers are in fact disabled for the work they are to perform.(c) A special minimum wage certificate shall be effective for a periodto be designated by the Administrator. Workers with disabilities may bepaid wages lower than the statutory minimum wage rate set forth in section6 of FLSA only during the effective period of the certificate.(d) Workers paid under special minimum wage certificates shall be paidwages commensurate with those paid experienced nondisabled workers employedin the vicinity in which they are employed for essentially the same type,quality, and quantity of work.(e) Workers with disabilities shall be paid not less than one and one-halftimes their regular rates of pay for all hours worked in excess of themaximum workweek applicable under section 7 of FLSA.(f) The wages of all workers paid a special minimum wage under this partshall be adjusted by the employer at periodic intervals at a minimum ofonce a year to reflect changes in the prevailing wages paid to experiencedindividuals not disabled for the work to be performed employed in the vicinityfor essentially the same type of work.(g) Each worker with a disability and, where appropriate, a parent or guardianof the worker, shall be informed, orally and in writing, of the terms ofthe certificate under which such worker is employed. This requirement maybe satisfied by making copies of the certificate available. Where a workerwith disabilities displays an understanding of the terms of a certificateand requests that other parties not be informed, it is not necessary toinform a parent or guardian.(h) In establishing piece rates for workers with disabilities, the followingcriteria shall be used:(1) Industrial work measurement methods such as stop watch time studies,predetermined time systems, standard data, or other measurement methods(hereinafter referred to as ``work measurement methods'') shall be usedby the employer to establish standard production rates of workers not disabledfor the work to be performed. The Department will accept the use of whatevermethod an employer chooses to use. However, the employer has the responsibilityof demonstrating that a particular method is generally accepted by industrialengineers and has been properly executed. No specific training or certificationwill be required. Where work measurement methods have already been appliedby another employer or source, and documentation exists to show that themethods used are the same, it is not necessary to repeat these methodsto establish production standards.(i) The piece rates shall be based on the standard production rates (numberof units an experienced worker not disabled for the work is expected toproduce per hour) and the prevailing industry wage rate paid experiencednondisabled workers in the vicinity for essentially the same type and qualityof work or for work requiring similar skill. (Prevailing industry wagerate divided by the standard number of units per hour equals the piecerate.).(ii) Piece rates shall not be less than the prevailing piece rates paidexperienced workers not disabled for the work doing the same or similarwork in the vicinity when such piece rates exist and can be compared withthe actual employment situations of the workers with disabilities.(2) Any work measurement method used to establish piece rates shall beverifiable through the use of established industrial work measurement techniques.(i) If stop watch time studies are made, they shall be made with a personor persons whose productivity represents normal or near normal performance.If their productivity does not represent normal or near normal performance,adjustments of performance shall be made. Such adjustments, sometimes called``performance rating'' or ``leveling'' shall be made only by a person knowledgeablein this technique, as evidenced by successful completion of training inthis area. The persons observed should be given time to practice the workto be performed in order to provide them with an opportunity to overcomethe initial learning curve. The persons observed shall be trained to usethe specific work method and tools which are available to workers withdisabilities employed under special minimum wage certificates.(ii) Appropriate time shall be allowed for personal time, fatigue, andunavoidable delays. Generally, not less than 15% allowances (9-10 minutesper hour) shall be used in conducting time studies.(iii) Work measurements shall be conducted using the same work method thatwill be utilized by the workers with disabilities. When modifications suchas jigs or fixtures are made to production methods to accommodate specialneeds of individual workers with disabilities, additional work measurementsneed not be conducted where the modifications enable the workers with disabilitiesto perform the work or increase productivity but would impede a workerwithout disabilities. Where workers with disabilities do not have a methodavailable to them, as for example where an adequate number of machinesare not available, a second work measurement should be conducted.(i) Each worker with a disability employed on a piece rate basis shouldbe paid full earnings. Employers may ``pool'' earnings only where piecerates cannot be established for each individual worker. An example of thissituation is a team production operation where each worker's individualcontribution to the finished product cannot be determined separately. However,in such situations, the employer should make every effort to objectivelydivide the earnings according to the productivity level of each individualworker.(j) The following terms shall be met for workers with disabilities employedat hourly rates:(1) Hourly rates shall be based upon the prevailing hourly wage rates paidto experienced workers not disabled for the job doing essentially the sametype of work and using similar methods or equipment in the vicinity. (Seealso andSection; 525.10.)(2) An initial evaluation of a worker's productivity shall be made withinthe first month after employment begins in order to determine the worker'scommensurate wage rate. The results of the evaluation shall be recordedand the worker's wages shall be adjusted accordingly no later than thefirst complete pay period following the initial evaluation. Each workeris entitled to commensurate wages for all hours worked. Where the wagespaid to the worker during pay periods prior to the initial evaluation wereless than the commensurate wage indicated by the evaluation, the employermust compensate the worker for any such difference unless it can be demonstratedthat the initial payments reflected the commensurate wage due at that time.(3) Upon completion of not more than six months of employment, a reviewshall be made with respect to the quantity and quality of work of eachhourly-rated worker with a disability as compared to that of nondisabledworkers engaged in similar work or work requiring similar skills and thefindings shall be recorded. The worker's productivity shall then be reviewedand the findings recorded at least every 6 months thereafter. A reviewand recording of productivity shall also be made after a worker changesjobs and at least every 6 months thereafter. The worker's wages shall beadjusted accordingly no later than the first complete pay period followingeach review. Conducting reviews at six-month intervals should be viewedas a minimum requirement since workers with disabilities are entitled tocommensurate wages for all hours worked. Reviews must be conducted in amanner and frequency to insure payment of commensurate wages. For example,evaluations should not be conducted before a worker has had an opportunityto become familiar with the job or at a time when the worker is fatiguedor subject to conditions that result in less than normal productivity.(4) Each review should contain, as a minimum and in addition to the datacited above, the following: name of the individual being reviewed; dateand time of the review; and, name and position of the individual doingthe review.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Renewal of special minimum wage certificates.</ITAG>(a) Applications may be filed for renewal of special minimum wage certificates.(b) If an application for renewal has been properly and timely filed, anexisting special minimum wage certificate shall remain in effect untilthe application for renewal has been granted or denied.(c) Workers with disabilities may not continue to be paid special minimumwages after notice that an application for renewal has been denied. (d) Except in cases of willfulness or those in which the public interestrequires otherwise, before an application for renewal is denied facts orconduct which may warrant such action shall be called to the attentionof the employer in writing and such employer shall be afforded an opportunityto demonstrate or achieve compliance with all legal requirements. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.14</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Posting of notices. </ITAG>Every employer having workers who are employed under special minimum wagecertificates shall at all times display and make available to employeesa poster as prescribed and supplied by the Administrator. The Administratorwill make available, upon request, posters in other formats such as Brailleor recorded tapes. Such a poster will explain, in general terms, the conditionsunder which special minimum wages may be paid and shall be posted in aconspicuous place on the employer's premises where it may be readily observedby the workers with disabilities, the parents and guardians of such workers,and other workers. Where an employer finds it inappropriate to post sucha notice, this requirement may be satisified by providing the poster directlyto all employees subject to its terms. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Industrial homework. </ITAG>(a) Where the employer is an organization or institution carrying out arecognized program of rehabilitation for workers with disabilities andholds a special certificate issued pursuant to this part, certificationunder regulations governing the employment of industrial homeworkers (29CFR Part 530) is not required. (b) For all other types of employers, special rules apply to the employmentof homeworkers in the following industries: Jewelry manufacturing, knittedouterwear, gloves and mittens, buttons and buckles, handkerchief manufacturing,embroideries, and women's apparel. (See 29 CFR Part 530.)<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.16</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Records to be kept by employers.</ITAG>Every employer, or where appropriate (in the case of records verifyingthe workers' disabilities) the referring agency or facility, of workersemployed under special minimum wage certificates shall maintain and haveavailable for inspection records indicating:(a) Verification of the workers' disabilities;(b) Evidence of the productivity of each worker with a disability gatheredon a continuing basis or at periodic intervals (not to exceed six monthsin the case of employees paid hourly wage rates);(c) The prevailing wages paid workers not disabled for the job performedwho are employed in industry in the vicinity for essentially the same typeof work using similar methods and equipment as that used by each workerwith disabilities employed under a special minimum wage certificate (seealso andSection; 525.10(b) and (d));(d) The production standards and supporting documentation for nondisabledworkers for each job being performed by workers with disabilities employedunder special certificates; and(e) The records required under all of the applicable provisions of Part516 of this title, except that any provision pertaining to homeworker handbooksshall not be applicable to workers with disabilities who are employed bya recognized nonprofit rehabilitation facility and working in or abouta home, apartment, tenement, or room in a residential establishment. (SeeandSection; 525.15) Records required by this section shall be maintainedand preserved for the periods specified in Part 516 of this title.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number1215-0017)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.17</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Revocation of certificates.</ITAG>(a) A special minimum wage certificate may be revoked for cause at anytime. A certificate may be revoked:(1) As of the date of issuance, if it is found that misrepresentationsor false statements have been made in obtaining the certificate or in permittinga worker with a disability to be employed thereunder;(2) As of the date of violation, if it is found that any of the provisionsof FLSA or of the terms of the certificate have been violated; or(3) As of the date of notice of revocation, if it is found that the certificateis no longer necessary in order to prevent curtailment of opportunitiesfor employment, or that the requirements of these regulations other thanthose referred to in (a)(2) above have not been complied with.(b) Except in cases of willfulness or those in which the public interestrequires otherwise, before any certificate shall be revoked, facts or conductwhich may warrant such action shall be called to the attention of the employerin writing and such employer shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrateor achieve compliance with all legal requirements.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.18</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review.</ITAG>Any person aggrieved by any action of the Administrator taken pursuantto this part may, within 60 days or such additional time as the Administratormay allow, file with the Administrator a petition for review. Such review,if granted, shall be made by the Administrator. Other interested persons,to the extent it is deemed appropriate, may be afforded an opportunityto present data and views.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Investigations and hearings.</ITAG>The Administrator may conduct an investigation, which may include a hearing,prior to taking any action pursuant to these regulations. To the extentit is deemed appropriate, the Administrator may provide an opportunityto other interested persons to present data and views. Proceedings initiatedpursuant to this section are separate from those taken pursuant to FLSAsection 14(c)(5) and andSection; 525.22.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Relation to other laws.</ITAG>No provision of these regulations, or of any special minimum wage certificateissued thereunder, shall excuse noncompliance with any other Federal orState law or municipal ordinance establishing higher standards.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lowering of wage rates.</ITAG>(a) No employer may reduce the minimum hourly wage rate, guaranteed bya special minimum wage certificate in effect on June 1, 1986, of any workerwith disabilities from June 1, 1986 until May 31, 1988, without prior authorizationof the Secretary.(b) This provision applies to those workers with disabilities who were:(1) Employed during the pay period which included June 1, 1986, even ifno work was performed during that pay period; and(2) Employed under a group or individual special minimum wage certificatewhich specified a minimum guaranteed rate, i.e., a special certificateissued under former section 14(c) (1) or (2)(b) of FLSA.(c) In order to obtain authority to lower the wage rate of a worker witha disability to whom this provision applies to a rate below the certificaterate, the employer must submit information as prescribed under this sectionto the appropriate Regional Office. The burden of establishing the necessityof lowering the wage of a worker with a disability rests with the employer.(d) In reviewing a request to lower a wage rate of a worker with a disability,documented evidence of the following will be considered:(1) Any change in the worker's disabling condition which has a substantiallynegative impact on productive capacity;(2) Any change in the type of work being performed in the facility whichwould affect the productivity of the worker with a disability or whichwould result in the application of a lower prevailing wage rate;(3) Any change in general economic conditions in the locality in whichthe work is performed which results in lower prevailing wage rates.(e) A wage rate may not be lowered until authorization is obtained.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Employee's right to petition.</ITAG>(a) Any employee receiving a special minimum wage at a rate specified pursuantto subsection 14(c) of FLSA or the parent or guardian of such an employeemay petition the Secretary to obtain a review of such special minimum wagerate. No particular form of petition is required, except that a petitionmust be signed by the individual, or the parent or guaradian of the individual,and should contain the name and address of the employee and the name andaddress of the employee's employer. A petition may be filed in person orby mail with the Administrator of the Wage and Hour Division, EmploymentStandards Administration, U.S. Department of Labor, Room S3502, 200 ConstitutionAvenue NW., Washington, DC 20210. The petitioner may be represented bycounsel in any stage of such proceedings. Upon receipt, the petition shallbe forwarded immediately to the Chief Administrative Law Judge.(b) Upon receipt of a petition, the Chief Administrative Law Judge shall,within 10 days of the receipt of the petition by the Secretary, appointan Administrative Law Judge (ALJ) to hear the case. Upon receipt, the ALJshall notify the employer named in the petition. The ALJ shall also notifythe employee, the employer, the Administrator, and the Associate Solicitorfor Fair Labor Standards of the time and place of the hearing. The dateof the hearing shall be not more than 30 days after the assignment of thecase to the ALJ. All the parties shall be given at least eight days' noticeof such hearing. Because of the time constraints imposed by the statute,requests for postponement shall be granted only sparingly and for compellingreasons.(c) Hearings held under this subpart shall be conducted, consistent withstatutory time limitations, under the Department's rules of practice andprocedure for administrative hearings found in 29 CFR Part 18. There shallbe a minimum of formality in the proceeding consistent with orderly procedure.Any employer who intends to participate in the proceeding shall provideto the ALJ, and shall serve on the petitioner and the Associate Solicitorfor Fair Labor Standards no later than 15 days prior to the commencementof the hearing, or as soon as practical depending on when the notice ofa hearing as required under paragraph (b) was received, that documentaryevidence pertaining to the employee or employees identified in the petitionwhich is contained in the records required by andSection; 525.16 (a), (b),(c) and (d). The Administrator shall be permitted to participate by counselin the proceeding upon application.(d) In determining whether any special minimum wage rate is justified,the ALJ shall consider, to the extent evidence is available, the productivityof the employee or employees identified in the petition and the conditionsunder which such productivity was measured, and the productivity of otheremployees performing work of essentially the same type and quality forother employers in the same vicinity and the conditions under which muchproductivity was mesured. In these proceedings, the burden of proof onall matters relating to the propriety of a wage at issue shall rest withthe employer.(e) The ALJ shall issue a decision within 30 days after the terminationof the hearing and shall serve the decision on the Administrator and allinterested parties by Express Mail or other similar system guaranteeingone-day delivery. The decision shall contain appropriate findings and conclusionsand an order. If the ALJ finds that the special minimum wage being paidor which has been paid is not justified, the order shall specify the lawfulrate and the period of employment to which the rate is applicable. In theabsence of evidence sufficient to support the conclusion that the properwage should be less than the minimum wage, the ALJ shall order that theminimum wage be paid.(f) Within 15 days after the date of the decision of the ALJ, the petitioner,the Administrator, or the employer who seeks review thereof may requestreview by the Secretary. No particular form of request is required, exceptthat a request must be in writing and must attach a copy of the ALJ's decision.Requests for review shall be filed with the Secretary of Labor, 200 ConstitutionAve. NW., Washington, DC 20210. Any other interested party may file a replythereto with the Secretary and the Administrator within 5 working daysof receipt of such request for review. The request for review and replythereto shall be transmitted by the Administrator to all interested partiesby Express Mail or other similar system guaranteeing one-day delivery.(g) The decision of the ALJ shall be deemed to be final agency action 30days after issuance thereof, unless within 30 days of the date of the decisionthe Secretary grants a request to review the decision. Where such requestfor review is granted, within 30 days after receipt of such request theSecretary shall review the record and shall either adopt the decision ofthe ALJ or issue exceptions. The decision of the ALJ, together with anyexceptions issued by the Secretary, shall be deemed to be a final agencyaction.(h) Within 30 days of issuance of the final action of the Secretary reviewingthe decision of the ALJ or declining to grant such review, any person adverselyaffected or aggrieved by such action may seek judicial review pursuantto Chapter 7 of Title 5, United States Code. The record of the case, includingthe record of proceedings before the ALJ, shall be transmitted by the Secretaryto the appropriate court pursuant to the rules of such court.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Work activities centers.</ITAG>Nothing in these regulations shall be interpreted to prevent an employerfrom maintaining or establishing work activities centers to provide therapeuticactivities for workers with disabilities as long as the employer complieswith the requirement of these regulations. Work activities centers shallinclude centers planned and designed to provide therapeutic activitiesfor workers with severe disabilities affecting their productive capacity.Any establishment whose workers with disabilities are employed at specialminimum wages must comply with the requirements of this part, regardlessof the designation of such establishment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 525.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Advisory Committee on Special Minimum Wages.</ITAG>The Advisory Committee on Special Minimum Wages, the members of which areappointed by the Secretary, shall advise and make recommendations to theAdministrator concerning the administration and enforcement of these regulationsand the need for amendments thereof and shall serve such other functionsas may be desired by the Administrator.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-18668 Filed 8-9-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-27-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>